Missouri, session 2026, HB1709.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 287.200, 287.470, 287.610, 287.615, 287.812, 287.835, and
621.045, RSMo, are repealed and seven new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 287.200, 287.470, 287.610, 287.615, 287.812, 287.835, and 621.045, to read as
follows:
287.200. 1. Compensation for permanent total disability shall be paid during the
continuance of such disability from the date of maximum medical improvement for the
lifetime of the employee at the weekly rate of compensation in effect under this subsection on
the date of the injury for which compensation is being made. The word "employee" as used
in this section shall not include the injured worker's dependents, estate, or other persons to
whom compensation may be payable as provided in subsection 1 of section 287.020. The
amount of such compensation shall be computed as follows:
(1) For all injuries occurring on or after September 28, 1983, but before September
28, 1986, the weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds
percent of the injured employee's average weekly earnings during the year immediately
preceding the injury, as of the date of the injury; provided that the weekly compensation paid
under this subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy percent of the state
average weekly wage, as such wage is determined by the division of employment security, as
of the July first immediately preceding the date of injury;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1709 2
(2) For all injuries occurring on or after September 28, 1986, but before August 28,
1990, the weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent
of the injured employee's average weekly earnings during the year immediately preceding the
injury, as of the date of the injury; provided that the weekly compensation paid under this
subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy-five percent of the state average
weekly wage, as such wage is determined by the division of employment security, as of the
July first immediately preceding the date of injury;
(3) For all injuries occurring on or after August 28, 1990, but before August 28, 1991,
the weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the
injured employee's average weekly earnings as of the date of the injury; provided that the
weekly compensation paid under this subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to one
hundred percent of the state average weekly wage;
(4) For all injuries occurring on or after August 28, 1991, the weekly compensation
shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the injured employee's average
weekly earnings as of the date of the injury; provided that the weekly compensation paid
under this subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to one hundred five percent of the
state average weekly wage;
(5) For all injuries occurring on or after September 28, 1981, the weekly
compensation shall in no event be less than forty dollars per week.
2. Permanent total disability benefits that have accrued through the date of the injured
employee's death are the only permanent total disability benefits that are to be paid in
accordance with section 287.230. The right to unaccrued compensation for permanent total
disability of an injured employee terminates on the date of the injured employee's death in
accordance with section 287.230, and does not survive to the injured employee's dependents,
estate, or other persons to whom compensation might otherwise be payable.
3. (1) All claims for permanent total disability shall be determined in accordance
with the facts. [When an injured employee receives an award for permanent total disability
but by the use of glasses, prosthetic appliances, or physical rehabilitation the employee is
restored to his or her regular work or its equivalent, the life payment mentioned in subsection
1 of this section shall be suspended during the time in which the employee is restored to his or
her regular work or its equivalent.] The employer and the division shall keep the file open in
the case during the lifetime of any injured employee who has received an award of permanent
total disability.
(2) When an injured employee receives an award for permanent total disability
but by the use of glasses, prosthetic appliances, or physical rehabilitation the employee
is restored to his or her regular work or its equivalent, the life payment mentioned in
subsection 1 of this section shall be suspended during the time in which the employee is

HB 1709 3
restored to his or her regular work or its equivalent. In any case where the life payment is
suspended under this [subsection] subdivision, the commission may at reasonable times
review the case and either the employee or the employer may request an informal conference
with the commission relative to the resumption of the employee's weekly life payment in the
case.
(3) Upon the filing of a written agreement signed by the claimant and his or her
attorney, the commission shall change the name, information, or fee arrangement of the
attorney or law firm associated with the claimant's case.
4. For all claims filed on or after January 1, 2014, for occupational diseases due to
toxic exposure which result in a permanent total disability or death, benefits in this chapter
shall be provided as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, such amount as due to the
employee during said employee's life as provided for under this chapter for an award of
permanent total disability and death, except such amount shall only be paid when benefits
under subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection have been exhausted;
(2) For occupational diseases due to toxic exposure, but not including mesothelioma,
an amount equal to two hundred percent of the state's average weekly wage as of the date of
diagnosis for one hundred weeks paid by the employer; and
(3) In cases where occupational diseases due to toxic exposure are diagnosed to be
mesothelioma:
(a) For employers that have elected to accept mesothelioma liability under this
subsection, an additional amount of three hundred percent of the state's average weekly wage
for two hundred twelve weeks shall be paid by the employer or group of employers such
employer is a member of. Employers that elect to accept mesothelioma liability under this
subsection may do so by either insuring their liability, by qualifying as a self-insurer, or by
becoming a member of a group insurance pool. A group of employers may enter into an
agreement to pool their liabilities under this subsection. If such group is joined, individual
members shall not be required to qualify as individual self-insurers. Such group shall comply
with section 287.223. In order for an employer to make such an election, the employer shall
provide the department with notice of such an election in a manner established by the
department. The provisions of this paragraph shall expire on December 31, 2038; or
(b) For employers who reject mesothelioma under this subsection, then the exclusive
remedy provisions under section 287.120 shall not apply to such liability. The provisions of
this paragraph shall expire on December 31, 2038; and
(4) The provisions of subdivision (2) and paragraph (a) of subdivision (3) of this
subsection shall not be subject to suspension of benefits as provided in subsection 3 of this
section; and

HB 1709 4
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, should the
employee die before the additional benefits provided for in subdivision (2) and paragraph (a)
of subdivision (3) of this subsection are paid, the additional benefits are payable to the
employee's spouse or children, natural or adopted, legitimate or illegitimate, in addition to
benefits provided under section 287.240. If there is no surviving spouse or children and the
employee has received less than the additional benefits provided for in subdivision (2) and
paragraph (a) of subdivision (3) of this subsection the remainder of such additional benefits
shall be paid as a single payment to the estate of the employee;
(6) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not be construed to
affect the employee's ability to obtain medical treatment at the employer's expense or any
other benefits otherwise available under this chapter.
100 5. Any employee who obtains benefits under subdivision (2) of subsection 4 of this
101 section for acquiring asbestosis who later obtains an award for mesothelioma shall not receive
102 more benefits than such employee would receive having only obtained benefits for
103 mesothelioma under this section.
287.470. 1. Upon its own motion or upon the application of any party in interest on
the ground of a change in condition, the commission may at any time upon a rehearing after
due notice to the parties interested review any award and on such review may make an award
ending, diminishing or increasing the compensation previously awarded, subject to the
maximum or minimum provided in this chapter, and shall immediately send to the parties and
the employer's insurer a copy of the award. No such review shall affect such award as regards
any moneys paid.
2. Upon the filing of a written agreement signed by the claimant and his or her
attorney, the commission shall change the name, information, or fee arrangement of the
attorney or law firm associated with the claimant's case.
287.610. 1. After August 28, 2005, the division may appoint additional
administrative law judges for a maximum of forty authorized administrative law judges.
Appropriations shall be based upon necessity, measured by the requirements and needs of
each division office. Administrative law judges shall be duly licensed lawyers under the laws
of this state. Administrative law judges shall not practice law or do law business and shall
devote their whole time to the duties of their office. The director of the division of workers'
compensation shall publish and maintain on the division's website the appointment dates or
initial dates of service for all administrative law judges.
2. [The thirteen administrative law judges with the most years of service shall be
subject to a retention vote on August 28, 2008. The next thirteen administrative law judges
with the most years of service in descending order shall be subject to a retention vote on
August 28, 2012. Administrative law judges appointed and not previously referenced in this

HB 1709 5
subsection shall be subject to a retention vote on August 28, 2016. Subsequent retention
votes shall be held every twelve years. Any administrative law judge who has received two
or more votes of no confidence under performance audits by the committee shall not receive a
vote of retention.
3. The administrative law judge review committee members shall not have any direct
or indirect employment or financial connection with a workers' compensation insurance
company, claims adjustment company, health care provider nor be a practicing workers'
compensation attorney. All members of the committee shall have a working knowledge of
workers' compensation.
4. The committee shall within thirty days of completing each performance audit make
a recommendation of confidence or no confidence for each administrative law judge.
5.] The administrative law judges appointed by the division shall only have
jurisdiction to hear and determine claims upon original hearing and shall have no jurisdiction
upon any review hearing, either in the way of an appeal from an original hearing or by way of
reopening any prior award, except to correct a clerical error in an award or settlement if the
correction is made by the administrative law judge within twenty days of the original award
or settlement. The labor and industrial relations commission may remand any decision of an
administrative law judge for a more complete finding of facts. The commission may also
correct a clerical error in awards or settlements within thirty days of its final award. With
respect to original hearings, the administrative law judges shall have such jurisdiction and
powers as are vested in the division of workers' compensation under other sections of this
chapter, and wherever in this chapter the word "commission", "commissioners" or "division"
is used in respect to any original hearing, those terms shall mean the administrative law
judges appointed under this section. When a hearing is necessary upon any claim, the
division shall assign an administrative law judge to such hearing. Any administrative law
judge shall have power to approve contracts of settlement, as provided by section 287.390,
between the parties to any compensation claim or dispute under this chapter pending before
the division of workers' compensation. Any award by an administrative law judge upon an
original hearing shall have the same force and effect, shall be enforceable in the same manner
as provided elsewhere in this chapter for awards by the labor and industrial relations
commission, and shall be subject to review as provided by section 287.480.
[6.] 3. Any of the administrative law judges employed pursuant to this section may be
assigned on a temporary basis to the branch offices as necessary in order to ensure the proper
administration of this chapter.
[7.] 4. All administrative law judges shall be required to participate in, on a
continuing basis, specific training that shall pertain to those elements of knowledge and
procedure necessary for the efficient and competent performance of the administrative law

HB 1709 6
judges' required duties and responsibilities. Such training requirements shall be established
by the division subject to appropriations and shall include training in medical determinations
and records, mediation and legal issues pertaining to workers' compensation adjudication.
Such training may be credited toward any continuing legal education requirements.
[8. (1) The administrative law judge review committee shall conduct a performance
audit of all administrative law judges every two years. The audit results, stating the
committee's recommendation of confidence or no confidence of each administrative law
judge shall be sent to the governor no later than the first week of each legislative session
immediately following such audit. Any administrative law judge who has received three or
more votes of no confidence under two successive performance audits by the committee may
have their appointment immediately withdrawn.
(2) The review committee shall consist of one member appointed by the president pro
tem of the senate, one member appointed by the minority leader of the senate, one member
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and one member appointed by the
minority leader of the house of representatives. The governor shall appoint to the committee
one member selected from the commission on retirement, removal, and discipline of judges.
This member shall act as a member ex officio and shall not have a vote in the committee. The
committee shall annually elect a chairperson from its members for a term of one year. The
term of service for all members shall be two years. The review committee members shall all
serve without compensation. Necessary expenses for review committee members and all
necessary support services to the review committee shall be provided by the division.]
5. The director of the division may file a complaint with the administrative
hearing commission, as provided under chapter 621, seeking to remove an
administrative law judge from office if the administrative law judge:
(1) Has committed any felony, as defined in subdivision (26) of section 556.061,
or misdemeanor, as defined in subdivision (33) of section 556.061, regardless of whether
a criminal charge has been filed;
(2) Has been convicted or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere in a
criminal prosecution under the laws of any state, the United States, or of any country,
regardless of whether sentence is imposed;
(3) Is guilty of misconduct, habitual intoxication, willful neglect of duty,
corruption in office, or incompetency; or
(4) Has committed any act that involves moral turpitude or oppression in office.
6. (1) Prior to the filing of the complaint, the director shall notify the
administrative law judge in writing of the reasons for the complaint.
(2) If the reason for the complaint is willful neglect of duty or incompetency, the
administrative law judge shall have ninety days from the date the complaint was made

HB 1709 7
to remedy the complained of behavior. If such complained of behavior has not been
remedied after ninety days, the director may file the complaint with the administrative
hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
7. After the director has filed a complaint with the administrative hearing
commission, the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing commission that:
(1) The grounds, provided in subsection 5 of this section, for disciplinary action
are met, the director may, singly or in combination, issue the following disciplinary
actions against the administrative law judge: removal from office, suspension from the
performance of duties for a period of time, or other discipline as determined by the
director. The director shall make a record of written findings of fact and conclusions of
law with respect to the issues and shall put a copy of such record in the administrative
law judge's permanent file; or
100 (2) There are no grounds for disciplinary action, the administrative law judge
101 shall immediately resume duties and shall receive any attorney's fees due under section
102 536.087.
103 8. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the following
104 events or acts by an administrative law judge are deemed to be an immediate threat to
105 the administration of the provisions of chapter 287 and shall be considered cause for
106 suspension with pay of the administrative law judge without notice, at the discretion of
107 the director:
108 (1) A crime for which the administrative law judge is being held without bond
109 for a period of more than fourteen days;
110 (2) Suspension or revocation of a license to practice law; or
111 (3) A declaration of incapacity by a court of competent jurisdiction.
112 9. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant to the authority of this section
113 shall become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter
114 536.
287.615. 1. The division may appoint or employ such persons as may be necessary to
the proper administration of this chapter. All salaries to clerical employees shall be fixed by
the division and approved by the labor and industrial relations commission. Beginning
January 1, 2006, the annual salary of each administrative law judge[,] and administrative law
judge in charge[, and chief legal counsel] shall be as follows:
(1) [For any chief legal counsel located at the division office in Jefferson City,
Missouri, compensation at two thousand dollars above eighty percent of the rate at which an
associate circuit judge is compensated;

HB 1709 8
(2)] For each administrative law judge, compensation at ninety percent of the rate at
which an associate division circuit judge is compensated;
[(3)] (2) For each administrative law judge in charge, compensation at the same rate
as an administrative law judge plus five thousand dollars.
2. Administrative law judges' and chief administrative law judges' compensation
shall be determined solely by the rate outlined in this section and shall not increase when
pay raises for executive employees are appropriated.
[2.] 3. The salary of the director of the division of workers' compensation shall be set
by the director of the department of labor and industrial relations, but shall not be less than the
salary plus two thousand dollars of an administrative law judge in charge. The appointees in
each classification shall be selected as nearly as practicable in equal numbers from each of the
two political parties casting the highest and the next highest number of votes for governor in
the last preceding state election.
287.812. As used in sections 287.812 to 287.855, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Administrative law judge", any person appointed pursuant to section 287.610 or
section 621.015, or any person who hereafter may have by law all of the powers now vested
by law in administrative law judges appointed under the provisions of the workers'
compensation law;
(2) "Beneficiary", a surviving spouse married to the deceased administrative law
judge or legal advisor of the division of workers' compensation continuously for a period of at
least two years immediately preceding the administrative law judge's or legal advisor's death
and also on the day of the last termination of such person's employment as an administrative
law judge or legal advisor for the division of workers' compensation, or if there is no
surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits, any minor child of the deceased administrative
law judge or legal advisor, or any child of the deceased administrative law judge or legal
advisor who, regardless of age, is unable to support himself because of intellectual disability,
disease or disability, or any physical handicap or disability, who shall share in the benefits on
an equal basis with all other beneficiaries;
(3) "Benefit", a series of equal monthly payments payable during the life of an
administrative law judge or legal advisor of the division of workers' compensation retiring
pursuant to the provisions of sections 287.812 to 287.855 or payable to a beneficiary as
provided in sections 287.812 to 287.850;
(4) "Board", the board of trustees of the Missouri state employees' retirement system;
(5) ["Chief legal counsel", any person appointed or employed under section 287.615
to serve in the capacity of legal counsel to the division;
(6)] "Division", the division of workers' compensation of the state of Missouri;

HB 1709 9
[(7)] (6) "Legal advisor", any person appointed or employed pursuant to section
287.600[,] or 287.615[, or 287.616] to serve in the capacity as a legal advisor or an associate
administrative law judge and any person appointed pursuant to section 286.010 or pursuant to
section 295.030, and any attorney or legal counsel appointed or employed pursuant to section
286.070;
[(8)] (7) "Salary", the total annual compensation paid for personal services as an
administrative law judge or legal advisor, or both, of the division of workers' compensation
by the state or any of its political subdivisions.
287.835. [1. No benefits provided pursuant to sections 287.812 to 287.855 shall be
paid to any person who has been removed from office by impeachment or for misconduct, nor
to any person who has been disbarred from the practice of law, nor to the beneficiary of any
such persons.
2.] The board of trustees of the Missouri state employees' retirement system shall
cease paying benefits to any beneficiary of an administrative law judge or legal advisor who
is charged with the intentional killing of the administrative law judge or legal advisor without
legal excuse or justification. A beneficiary who is convicted of such charges shall no longer
be entitled to receive benefits. If the beneficiary is not convicted of such charge, the board
shall resume payment of benefits and shall pay the beneficiary any benefits that were
suspended pending resolution of such charge.
621.045. 1. The administrative hearing commission shall conduct hearings and make
findings of fact and conclusions of law in those cases when, under the law, a license issued by
any of the following agencies may be revoked or suspended or when the licensee may be
placed on probation or when an agency refuses to permit an applicant to be examined upon
his or her qualifications or refuses to issue or renew a license of an applicant who has passed
an examination for licensure or who possesses the qualifications for licensure without
examination:
Missouri State Board of Accountancy
Missouri State Board for Architects, Professional Engineers, Professional Land
Surveyors and Landscape Architects
Board of Barber Examiners
Board of Cosmetology
Board of Chiropody and Podiatry
Board of Chiropractic Examiners
Missouri Dental Board
Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors
Board of Registration for the Healing Arts
Board of Nursing

HB 1709 10
Board of Optometry
Board of Pharmacy
Missouri Real Estate Commission
Missouri Veterinary Medical Board
Supervisor of Liquor Control
Department of Health and Senior Services
Department of Commerce and Insurance
Department of Mental Health
Board of Private Investigator Examiners.
2. If in the future there are created by law any new or additional administrative
agencies which have the power to issue, revoke, suspend, or place on probation any license,
then those agencies are under the provisions of this law.
3. The administrative hearing commission is authorized to conduct hearings and make
findings of fact and conclusions of law in those cases brought by the Missouri state board for
architects, professional engineers, professional land surveyors and landscape architects
against unlicensed persons under section 327.076.
4. The administrative hearing commission is authorized to conduct hearings and
make findings of fact and conclusions of law in those cases brought by the division of
workers' compensation of the department of labor and industrial relations against
administrative law judges under section 287.610.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, after August
28, 1995, in order to encourage settlement of disputes between any agency described in
subsection 1 or 2 of this section and its licensees, any such agency shall:
(1) Provide the licensee with a written description of the specific conduct for which
discipline is sought and a citation to the law and rules allegedly violated, together with copies
of any documents which are the basis thereof and the agency's initial settlement offer, or file a
contested case against the licensee;
(2) If no contested case has been filed against the licensee, allow the licensee at least
sixty days, from the date of mailing, to consider the agency's initial settlement offer and to
contact the agency to discuss the terms of such settlement offer;
(3) If no contested case has been filed against the licensee, advise the licensee that the
licensee may, either at the time the settlement agreement is signed by all parties, or within
fifteen days thereafter, submit the agreement to the administrative hearing commission for
determination that the facts agreed to by the parties to the settlement constitute grounds for
denying or disciplining the license of the licensee; and

HB 1709 11
(4) In any contact under this subsection by the agency or its counsel with a licensee
who is not represented by counsel, advise the licensee that the licensee has the right to consult
an attorney at the licensee's own expense.
[5.] 6. If the licensee desires review by the administrative hearing commission under
subdivision (3) of subsection [4] 5of this section at any time prior to the settlement becoming
final, the licensee may rescind and withdraw from the settlement and any admissions of fact
or law in the agreement shall be deemed withdrawn and not admissible for any purposes
under the law against the licensee. Any settlement submitted to the administrative hearing
commission shall not be effective and final unless and until findings of fact and conclusions
of law are entered by the administrative hearing commission that the facts agreed to by the
parties to the settlement constitute grounds for denying or disciplining the license of the
licensee.
[6.] 7. When a holder of a license, registration, permit, or certificate of authority
issued by the division of professional registration or a board, commission, or committee of the
division of professional registration against whom an affirmative decision is sought has failed
to plead or otherwise respond in the contested case and adequate notice has been given under
sections 536.067 and 621.100 upon a properly pled writing filed to initiate the contested case
under this chapter or chapter 536, a default decision shall be entered against the licensee
without further proceedings. The default decision shall grant such relief as requested by the
division of professional registration, board, committee, commission, or office in the writing
initiating the contested case as allowed by law. Upon motion stating facts constituting a
meritorious defense and for good cause shown, a default decision may be set aside. The
motion shall be made within a reasonable time, not to exceed thirty days after entry of the
default decision. "Good cause" includes a mistake or conduct that is not intentionally or
recklessly designed to impede the administrative process.
✔